Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4589.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 803v. (1) An individual who was or is a member of the United States Armed Forces Reserve or any branch of the United States Armed Forces during Operation Inherent Resolve may apply to the secretary of state for a special registration plate that displays an appropriate vignette preceding the registration numbers and has the words "Operation Inherent Resolve" inscribed beneath the registration numbers. (2) The application for a special registration plate must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and accompanied by any proof of the applicant being or having been active duty during Operation Inherent Resolve that the secretary of state may require. The application for a special registration plate must not require a service fee under section 804. (3) Upon proper application, the secretary of state shall issue 1 or more special registration plates under this section for each applicant for use on a passenger vehicle. An individual who is a disabled person and applies for a special registration plate under this section must be issued a tab for persons with disabilities as provided in section 803f for the applicant's special registration plate. The secretary of state shall require the same proof that the applicant is a disabled person as is required for issuance of a permanent windshield placard under section 675. An individual issued 1 or more special registration plates under subsection (1) must be assessed the applicable tax provided in section 801. (4) The use of a special registration plate issued under this section on a vehicle other than the vehicle for which the plate is issued, or by an individual who does not qualify under this section, is a misdemeanor. (5) The special registration plate issued under this section expires on the birthday of the vehicle owner. When new plates are issued by the secretary of state, application for renewal of the special registration plate must not require a service fee under section 804. The applicant is not required to furnish the proof provided in subsection (2) for renewal. (6) As used in this section, "Operation Inherent Resolve" means the United States military operation that began on June 15, 2014 in Iraq and Syria.